District of Columbia statutes.
48-902.03

Schedule I tests.

The Mayor shall place a substance in Schedule I if the Mayor finds that the substance:

(1)

Has high potential for abuse; and

(2)

Has no accepted medical use in treatment in the United States or in the District of Columbia or lacks accepted safety for use in treatment under medical supervision.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 203, 28 DCR 3081

History

1981 Ed., § 33-513.

Prior Codifications